Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Sec. 10.55.103.
Relationship of this chapter to other laws.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

Except as expressly provided in this chapter, this chapter does not authorize an act prohibited by, and does not affect the application or requirements of, law other than this chapter.

A transaction accomplished under this chapter may not create or impair any right or obligation of a person under a provision of the law of this state other than this chapter relating to a change in control, takeover, business combination, control-share acquisition, or similar transaction involving a domestic merging, acquired, converting, or domesticating corporation unless,

if the corporation does not survive the transaction, the transaction satisfies any requirements of the provision; or

if the corporation survives the transaction, the approval of the plan is by a vote of the shareholders or directors that would be sufficient to create or impair the right or obligation directly under the provision.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.104.
Required notice or approval.

A domestic or foreign entity that is required to give notice to, or obtain the approval of, a governmental agency or officer in order to be a party to a merger shall give the notice or obtain the approval in order to be a party to an interest exchange, conversion, or domestication.

Property held for a charitable purpose under the law of this state by a domestic or foreign entity immediately before a transaction under this chapter becomes effective may not, as a result of the transaction, be diverted from the objects for which it was donated, granted, or devised unless, to the extent required by or under the law of this state concerning the nondiversion of charitable assets, the entity obtains an appropriate order of the superior court specifying the disposition of the property.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.105.
Status of filings.

A filing under this chapter becomes part of the public organic document of the entity.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.106.
Nonexclusivity.

The fact that a transaction under this chapter produces a certain result does not preclude the same result from being accomplished in any other manner permitted by law other than this chapter.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.107.
Reference to external facts.

A plan may refer to facts ascertainable outside of the plan if the manner in which the facts will operate on the plan is specified in the plan. The facts may include the occurrence of an event or a determination or action by a person, whether or not the event, determination, or action is within the control of a party to the transaction.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.108.
Alternative means of approval of transactions.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of a domestic entity, approval of a transaction under this chapter by the unanimous vote or consent of its interest holders satisfies the requirements of this chapter for approval of the transaction.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.109.
Dissenters’ rights.

An interest holder of a domestic merging, acquired, converting, or domesticating entity is entitled to dissenters’ rights in connection with the transaction if the interest holder would have been entitled to dissenters’ rights under the entity’s organic law in connection with a merger in which the interest of the interest holder was changed, converted, or exchanged unless

the organic law permits the organic rules to limit the availability of dissenters’ rights; and

the organic rules provide the limit described in (1) of this subsection.

An interest holder of a domestic merging, acquired, converting, or domesticating entity is entitled to contractual dissenters’ rights in connection with a transaction under this chapter to the extent provided

in the entity’s organic rules;

in the plan; or

in the case of a business corporation, by action of its governors.

If an interest holder is entitled to contractual dissenters’ rights under (b) of this section and the entity’s organic law does not provide procedures for the conduct of a dissenters’ rights proceeding, the interest holder is entitled to use the procedures established under AS

10.06.576

as if the interest holder were a dissenting shareholder of a corporation under AS 10.06.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.110.
Excluded entities and transactions.

The following entities may not participate in a transaction under this chapter:

a financial institution; in this paragraph, “financial institution” has the meaning given in AS

06.01.050

;

an insurer regulated by AS 21, including a fraternal benefit society regulated under AS 21.84;

a business and industrial development corporation under AS 10.10;

a BIDCO under AS 10.13;

a cooperative under AS 10.15;

a cooperative under AS 10.25 (Electric and Telephone Cooperative Act);

a public corporation; or

a municipality.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.120.
Names.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, if a domestic entity is created under this chapter or if the name of a domestic entity is changed under this chapter, the name of the domestic entity may not be a name that is reserved or registered to another entity under AS 10.35 and must comply with the name requirements of any organic law that applies to the domestic entity.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)